Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2105.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Employer Self-audit Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affected employee." An employee affected by a violation of a labor act that resulted in unpaid wages or a negligent violation."Employee." As defined in the labor act under which the individual was considered an affected employee."Employer." As defined in the labor act under which a 1234567891011121314151617181920 violation was found as the result of a self-audit."Good faith." With respect to an employer applying for participation in the self-audit program established under section 3, that the employer is not, at the time the employer submits an application for the program:(1) Under investigation by the secretary for an alleged violation of a labor act.(2) Subject to a lawsuit related to an alleged violation of a labor act."Labor act." Any of the following:(1) The act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.637, No.329), known as the Wage Payment and Collection Law.(2) The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(3) The act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.(4) The act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act.(5) The act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the Child Labor Act."Negligent violation." A violation that is not one of the following:(1) a willful violation;(2) a violation which causes bodily injury to a minor or creates a significant risk of bodily injury to a minor; or(3) a violation related to falsification of records."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth, or a duly authorized representative."Self-audit." An audit conducted by an employer to resolve inaccuracies by the employer in the computation of wages or 20250HB2105PN2723 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determining a negligent violation under a labor act."Unpaid wage violation." A violation that affected the monetary compensation of an affected employee.Section 3. Employer self-audit program.(a) Establishment.--The secretary shall establish an employer self-audit program to foster collaboration with employers to voluntarily remedy unpaid wages owed to an affected employee or cure a negligent violation that was the result of an employer inadvertently violating a labor act.(b) Application requirements.--(1) The secretary shall:(i) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph, make available to employers resources for assistance in complying with a labor act, which shall be offered through electronic and printed materials.(ii) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this paragraph, make available resources for assistance in applying for the program.(2) An employer seeking to participate in the program shall submit an application to the secretary that includes:(i) Materials related to and the results of a self-audit, including:(A) An identification of any practice of the employer identified in a self-audit that may have resulted in an unpaid wage violation or negligent violation.(B) A list of each employee who may be an affected employee with respect to the violation, including:(I) The period of time the employee would 20250HB2105PN2723 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have been affected by the violation.(II) Payroll records related to the employee for the period with information on the hours of work performed by the employee.(III) Contact information for the employee.(ii) For an unpaid wage violation, in addition to the materials under subparagraph (i), the following shall be required:(A) A calculation of unpaid wages owed to an affected employee with a description of the methodology of the calculation and supporting evidence.(B) An explanation of the scope of potential violations of unpaid wage requirements of the labor act for inclusion in a release of claims under subsection (e).(iii) An assurance that a practice of the employer that resulted in a violation of unpaid wages or a negligent violation that is identified in the self-audit has been corrected to comply with the labor act under which the violation occurred.(iv) An assurance that the employer has, prior to submitting the application, reviewed the compliance assistance resources made available under paragraph (1) and program information, terms and requirements.(v) An assurance that, on the date of submission of the application, the employer:(A) Is not involved in any litigation regarding a practice of the employer that is identified in the self-audit.20250HB2105PN2723 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) Has not received any communications from an employee or a representative of an employee seeking to litigate or settle claims related to the practice.(c) Application review and approval.--(1) The secretary shall review each application submitted by an employer under subsection (b)(2). As part of the review, the secretary shall:(i) As necessary, consult with the employer regarding:(A) The self-audit and supporting materials submitted in the application.(B) The process for approval of the application and settlement of unpaid wages owed to an affected employee.(ii) Inform the employer in a timely manner and prior to a determination on the approval of the application if additional information is needed to assess the unpaid wages owed to an affected employee or the scope of the negligent violation identified in the application through the self-audit.(iii) Provide the employer an opportunity to amend the application to:(A) Revise the scope of the practices of the employer that resulted in an unpaid wage violation or negligent violation that was identified in the application through self-audit.(B) Update the list of affected employees with respect to the practices at issue in the self-audit.(C) Update the calculations of unpaid wages owed to an affected employee as a result of the 20250HB2105PN2723 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations.(2) If the conditions under subsection (d) are satisfied with respect to an application submitted under subsection (b)(2), the secretary shall:(i) Approve the application:(A) if the application has not been amended under paragraph (1), not later than 30 days after such submission; or(B) if the application has been amended under paragraph (1), not later than 30 days after the date of submission of such amended application.(ii) Supervise the settlement under subsection (e), including the payment of unpaid wages required through the settlement.(d) Conditions of approval.--An application submitted under subsection (b)(2) shall be approved under subsection (c)(2) if:(1) Within the scope of the violations identified by the employer through the application or an amendment to the application under subsection (c)(1), the secretary verifies that the self-audit and calculation of unpaid wages owed to an affected employee or scope of negligent violation submitted in the application or amendment is accurate.(2) The employer submitting the application:(i) Is determined to be acting in good faith regarding violations identified in the application or amendment.(ii) Has not been found by the secretary or a court of law to have violated an unpaid wage requirement or negligent violation of a labor act for five years immediately preceding submission of the application.20250HB2105PN2723 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Has not been approved for participation in the program prior to the submission of the application, unless:(A) participation was for a distinct violation of a separate act that is not the current labor act identified in the self-audit under subsection (b)(2); and(B) the employer has submitted the necessary materials for the secretary to verify that the employer is not engaging in the practice addressed by the previous participation of the employer in the program.(e) Settlement.--(1) For an employer that submits an application under subsection (b)(2) due to an unpaid wage violation that is approved under subsection (c)(2), the secretary shall:(i) Provide to the employer a description of the scope of the potential release of claims for violations of unpaid wage requirements and a summary of unpaid wages owed to each affected employee under the labor act for the violations.(ii) Issue a release form to each affected employee of the employer that describes the settlement terms, which includes a written explanation of:(A) The waiver under paragraph (2)(ii).(B) The right of the affected employee receiving the offer for settlement to decline the offer for settlement and preserve any private right of action of the employee to recover unpaid wages owed to the employee under the labor act as a result of the 20250HB2105PN2723 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations.(2) (i) An affected employee offered a settlement through a release form under paragraph (1)(ii) may accept or decline the offer.(ii) The acceptance by an affected employee of an offer of settlement under subparagraph (i) shall, upon payment in full of any amounts owed to the employee under the settlement, constitute a waiver by the employee of any right the employee may have to a private right of action to recover unpaid wages, including liquidated damages, for the violations addressed by the settlement.(3) For an affected employee that accepts a settlement through a release form under paragraph (1)(ii), the employer shall:(i) pay the employee the full amount of unpaid wages owed to the employee for the violations addressed in the settlement; and(ii) submit proof of payment of the full amount to the secretary.(f) Release from administrative penalties.--An employer that submits an application under subsection (b)(2) that is approved under subsection (c)(2) shall receive a warning for a first violation and shall not be subject to any administrative penalties under a labor act in which the violation identified in the self-audit occurred.(g) Additional requirements.--(1) In the case of an application submitted by an employer under subsection (b)(2) that is not approved under subsection (c)(2), the secretary may not:(i) use information submitted in the application in 20250HB2105PN2723 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an investigation against the employer;(ii) use the fact that the employer applied to the program as a basis for any future investigation, except if the secretary has reason to believe that the health and safety of an employee is at risk due to an alleged violation related to a requirement enforced by the secretary; or(iii) communicate to an affected employee of the employer in response to receipt of the application to notify the employee of the private right of action of the employee to resolve potential violations, particularly with respect to the wage practices at issue in the self-audit.(2) The secretary may not expand the scope of the violations to be investigated or settled through an employer's participation in the program beyond the violations identified by the employer in the application submitted by the employer under subsection (b)(2) or the amended application submitted by the employer under subsection (c)(1)(iii).(3) The secretary may not require any form of payment by an employer to apply, qualify or participate in the program.(4) Information submitted in an application to the program under subsection (b)(2), or an amendment to the application under subsection (c)(1)(iii), may not be subject to discovery in a Federal or State court proceeding without the consent of the employer that submitted the application.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2105PN2723 - 9 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829